Utah statutes.
59-21-1.   Disposition of federal mineral lease monies -- Priority to
political subdivisions impacted by mineral development -- Disposition of
mineral bonus payments -- Appropriation of monies attributable to royalties
from extraction of minerals on federal land located within boundaries of Grand
Staircase-Escalante National Monument.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) through (4), all monies received
from the United States under the provisions of the Mineral Lands Leasing Act,
30 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq., shall:
(a)  be deposited in the Mineral Lease Account of the General Fund; and
(b)  be appropriated by the Legislature giving priority to those subdivisions
of the state socially or economically impacted by development of minerals
leased under the Mineral Lands Leasing Act, for:
(i)  planning;
(ii)  construction and maintenance of public facilities; and
(iii)  provision of public services.
(2)  Seventy percent of money received from federal mineral lease bonus
payments shall be deposited into the Permanent Community Impact Fund and shall
be used as provided in Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 3, Community Impact
Alleviation.
(3)  Thirty percent of money received from federal mineral lease bonus
payments shall be deposited in the Mineral Bonus Account created by Subsection
59-21-2(1) and appropriated as provided in that subsection.
(4) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (4):
(i)  the "boundaries of the Grand Staircase-Escalante National Monument" means
the boundaries:
(A)  established by Presidential Proclamation No. 6920, 61 Fed. Reg. 50,223
(1996); and
(B)  modified by:
(I)  Pub. L. No. 105-335, 112 Stat. 3139; and
(II)  Pub. L. No. 105-355, 112 Stat. 3247; and
(ii)  a special service district, school district, or federal land is
considered to be located within the boundaries of the Grand Staircase-
Escalante National Monument if a portion of the special service district,
school district, or federal land is located within the boundaries described in
Subsection (4)(a)(i).
(b)  Beginning on July 1, 1999, the Legislature shall appropriate, as provided
in Subsections (4)(c) through (g), monies received from the United States that
are attributable to royalties from the extraction of minerals on federal land
that, on September 18, 1996, was located within the boundaries of the Grand
Staircase-Escalante National Monument.
(c)  The Legislature shall annually appropriate 40% of the monies described in
Subsection (4)(b) to the Department of Transportation to be distributed by the
Department of Transportation to special service districts that are:
(i)  established by counties under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service
District Act;
(ii)  socially or economically impacted by the development of minerals under
the Mineral Lands Leasing Act; and
(iii)  located within the boundaries of the Grand Staircase-Escalante National
Monument.
(d)  The Department of Transportation shall distribute the money described in
Subsection (4)(c) in amounts proportionate to the amount of federal mineral
lease money generated by the county in which a special service district is
located.
(e)  The Legislature shall annually appropriate 40% of the monies described in
Subsection (4)(b) to the State Board of Education to be distributed equally to
school districts that are:
(i)  socially or economically impacted by the development of minerals under
the Mineral Lands Leasing Act; and
(ii)  located within the boundaries of the Grand Staircase-Escalante National
Monument.
(f)  The Legislature shall annually appropriate 2.25% of the monies described
in Subsection (4)(b) to the Utah Geological Survey to facilitate the
development of energy and mineral resources in counties that are:
(i)  socially or economically impacted by the development of minerals under
the Mineral Lands Leasing Act; and
(ii)  located within the boundaries of the Grand Staircase-Escalante National
Monument.
(g)  Seventeen and three-fourths percent of the monies described in Subsection
(4)(b) shall be deposited annually into the State School Fund established by
Utah Constitution Article X, Section 5.
